apertium-mar.mar.dix
		<pardef n="न्हाव/ी__n_f">
			<e> 		<p><l>ी</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>्या</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>्या</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ी</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>्यां</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>्यां</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="न्हाव/ी__n_nt">
			<e> 		<p><l>ी</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>्या</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>्या</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ी</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>्यां</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>्यां</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="न्हाव/ी__n">
			<e> 		<p><l>ी</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>्या</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>्या</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ी</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>्यां</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>्यां</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="क्रिकेट__n_nt">
			<e> 		<p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
		</pardef>


		<pardef n="सूज__n_f">
			<e> 		<p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>े</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>े</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ा</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ां</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ां</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="हौस__n_f">
			<e> 		<p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>े</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>े</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ा</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ां</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ां</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="प्रवासी__n_m">
			<e> 		<p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ं</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ं</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="भिकार/ी__n_f">
			<e> 		<p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>्यां</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>्यां</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="भिकार/ी__n_m">
			<e> 		<p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>्यां</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>्यां</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="गाय__n_f">
			<e> 		<p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ी</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ी</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ीं</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ीं</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="ब/ी__n_nt">
			<e> 		<p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ि</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ि</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>िया</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ियां</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ियां</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="ब/ी__n_f">
			<e> 		<p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ि</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ि</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>िया</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ियां</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ियां</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
		</pardef>

		<e lm="बी">                      		<i>ब</i><par n="ब/ी__n_nt" /></e>
		<e lm="लोणी">                      		<i>लोण</i><par n="ब/ी__n_nt" /></e>
		<e lm="फी">                      		<i>फ</i><par n="ब/ी__n_f" /></e>
		<e lm="लोणी">                      		<i>लोण</i><par n="ब/ी__n_f" /></e>
		<e lm="स्त्री">                      		<i>स्त्र</i><par n="ब/ी__n_f" /></e>
		<e lm="तिपायी">                      		<i>तिपाय</i><par n="ब/ी__n_f" /></e>
		<e lm="परस्त्री">                      		<i>परस्त्र</i><par n="ब/ी__n_f" /></e>
		<e lm="गाय">                      		<i>गाय</i><par n="गाय__n_f" /></e>
		<e lm="सोय">                      		<i>सोय</i><par n="गाय__n_f" /></e>
		<e lm="सदाचारी">                      	<i>सदाचार</i><par n="भिकार/ी__n_m" /></e>
		<e lm="भिकारी">                       	<i>भिकार</i><par n="भिकार/ी__n_m" /></e>
		<e lm="व्याही">                       	<i>व्याह</i><par n="भिकार/ी__n_m" /></e>
		<e lm="गावकरी">                       	<i>गावकर</i><par n="भिकार/ी__n_m" /></e>
		<e lm="चपराषी">                       	<i>चपराष</i><par n="भिकार/ी__n_m" /></e>
		<e lm="माळी">                         	<i>माळ</i><par n="भिकार/ी__n_m" /></e>
		<e lm="तंद्री">                       	<i>तंद्र</i><par n="भिकार/ी__n_f" /></e>
		<e lm="हजरी">                         	<i>हजर</i><par n="भिकार/ी__n_f" /></e>
		<e lm="कस्तुरी">                      	<i>कस्तुर</i><par n="भिकार/ी__n_f" /></e>
		<e lm="थोतरी">                        	<i>थोतर</i><par n="भिकार/ी__n_f" /></e>
		<e lm="विजेरी">                       	<i>विजेर</i><par n="भिकार/ी__n_f" /></e>
		<e lm="कडसरी">                        	<i>कडसर</i><par n="भिकार/ी__n_f" /></e>
		<e lm="प्रवासी">                      	<i>प्रवासी</i><par n="प्रवासी__n_m" /></e>
		<e lm="अविष्वासी">                    	<i>अविष्वासी</i><par n="प्रवासी__n_m" /></e>
		<e lm="रहिवासी">                      	<i>रहिवासी</i><par n="प्रवासी__n_m" /></e>
		<e lm="फरसी">                         	<i>फरसी</i><par n="प्रवासी__n_m" /></e>
		<e lm="चंद्रप्रवासी">                 	<i>चंद्रप्रवासी</i><par n="प्रवासी__n_m" /></e>
		<e lm="तापसी">                        	<i>तापसी</i><par n="प्रवासी__n_m" /></e>
		<e lm="षक्कल">                        	<i>षक्कल</i><par n="हौस__n_f" /></e>
		<e lm="वन्स">                         	<i>वन्स</i><par n="हौस__n_f" /></e>
		<e lm="आच">                           	<i>आच</i><par n="हौस__n_f" /></e>
		<e lm="कमर">                          	<i>कमर</i><par n="हौस__n_f" /></e>
		<e lm="खुण">                          	<i>खुण</i><par n="हौस__n_f" /></e>
		<e lm="संसद">                         	<i>संसद</i><par n="हौस__n_f" /></e>
		<e lm="गुंज">                         	<i>गुंज</i><par n="सूज__n_f" /></e>
		<e lm="तिडिक">                        	<i>तिडिक</i><par n="सूज__n_f" /></e>
		<e lm="पितळ">                         	<i>पितळ</i><par n="सूज__n_f" /></e>
		<e lm="मूस">                          	<i>मूस</i><par n="सूज__n_f" /></e>
		<e lm="हाक">                          	<i>हाक</i><par n="सूज__n_f" /></e>
		<e lm="सूज">                          	<i>सूज</i><par n="सूज__n_f" /></e>
		<e lm="हीनलक्शणी">                    	<i>हीनलक्शण</i><par n="न्हाव/ी__n" /></e>
		<e lm="मानवतावादी">                   	<i>मानवतावाद</i><par n="न्हाव/ी__n" /></e>
		<e lm="पाणी">                         	<i>पाण</i><par n="न्हाव/ी__n_nt" /></e>
		<e lm="परमार्थी">                     	<i>परमार्थ</i><par n="न्हाव/ी__n" /></e>
		<e lm="ग्ऋ्हस्थाष्रमी">               	<i>ग्ऋ्हस्थाष्रम</i><par n="न्हाव/ी__n" /></e>
		<e lm="पोटपाणी">                      	<i>पोटपाण</i><par n="न्हाव/ी__n_nt" /></e>
		<e lm="दही">                          	<i>दह</i><par n="न्हाव/ी__n_nt" /></e>
		<e lm="साम्राज्यवादी">                	<i>साम्राज्यवाद</i><par n="न्हाव/ी__n" /></e>
		<e lm="पानी">                         	<i>पान</i><par n="न्हाव/ी__n_nt" /></e>
		<e lm="खतपाणी">                       	<i>खतपाण</i><par n="न्हाव/ी__n_nt" /></e>
		<e lm="हवापाणी">                      	<i>हवापाण</i><par n="न्हाव/ी__n_nt" /></e>
		<e lm="अडाणी">                        	<i>अडाण</i><par n="न्हाव/ी__n" /></e>
		<e lm="धुणी">                         	<i>धुण</i><par n="न्हाव/ी__n_f" /></e>
		<e lm="क्रिकेट">                         	<i>क्रिकेट</i><par n="क्रिकेट__n_nt" /></e>
		<e lm="फुटबॉल">                         	<i>फुटबॉल</i><par n="क्रिकेट__n_nt" /></e>
		<e lm="टेनिस">                         	<i>टेनिस</i><par n="क्रिकेट__n_nt" /></e>
		<e lm="हॉकी">                         	<i>हॉकी</i><par n="क्रिकेट__n_nt" /></e>
